Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1222
Public power supplier, defined.

Public power supplier means a public power district or any other governmental entity providing electric service. Public power supplier includes a municipal electric utility or a rural public power supplier.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 22.